Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1146
Handicapped children; school district; educational service unit; contract for services.

The school district or educational service unit which received such funds as provided in section 79-1144 may contract with another school district, educational service unit, state school, or public agency.

Laws 1971, LB 178, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-611.01;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 35;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3334;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 828.